Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.035

Governor, lieutenant governor, and governor-elect—Security and protection—Duty to provide.

The chief of the Washington state patrol is directed to provide security and protection for the governor, the governor's family, and the lieutenant governor to the extent and in the manner the governor and the chief of the Washington state patrol deem adequate and appropriate.

In the same manner the chief of the Washington state patrol is directed to provide security and protection for the governor-elect from the time of the November election.

[ 1991 c 63 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 96 s 1.]